New York, session 2025-2026, A5092.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-y 2 to read as follows: 3 § 837-y. Desk appearance ticket report. The commissioner shall annual- 4 ly submit to the governor and the legislature and post to the depart- 5 ment's website a report regarding desk appearance tickets for the previ- 6 ous year. This report shall be both statewide and disaggregated by 7 county and shall include, but not be limited to, the number of desk 8 appearance tickets issued, the number of principals who did not appear 9 in court after being issued a desk appearance ticket, and the ratio of 10 desk appearance tickets issued to principals who did not appear in court 11 after being issued a desk appearance ticket. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08495-01-5